District of Columbia statutes.
18-702

International will; validity.

(a)

A will shall be valid as regards form, irrespective particularly of the place where it is made, of the location of the assets, and of the nationality, domicile, or residence of the testator, if it is made in the form of an international will complying with the requirements of this chapter.

(b)

The invalidity of the will as an international will shall not affect its formal validity as a will of another kind.

(c)

This chapter shall not apply to the form of testamentary dispositions made by 2 or more persons in one instrument.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 102(b), 48 DCR 2087
This section is referenced in § 18-701.